Idaho statutes. Title 44 LABOR
Chapter 22
MANUFACTURED HOME INSTALLATION STANDARD

Sec.

§ 44-2201. Mobile and manufactured homes installation.

All new manufactured homes must be installed in accordance with the manufacturer’s approved installation instructions. All used mobile and manufactured homes shall be installed in accordance with the Idaho manufactured home installation standard, as provided by rule pursuant to this chapter. All mobile and manufactured homes must be installed in accordance with all other applicable state laws or rules pertaining to utility connection requirements.

The administrator of the division of building safety may promulgate rules in accordance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, specifying standardized installation instructions for mobile and manufactured homes. Upon the effective date of such rules, the rules shall prevail over any conflicting provisions in this chapter.

§ 44-2202. Installation permits and inspections required.

The owner or the installer of a mobile or manufactured home must obtain an installation tag and permit as applicable before installing a mobile or manufactured home that will be used as a residence on a building site or in a park. The installer’s license must be in effect at the time of the application for the installation permit.

Installation tags shall be obtained from the division of building safety and are required for each installation of a new manufactured home. The fee for the installation tag shall be prescribed in administrative rules promulgated by the administrator of the division of building safety.

Installation permits shall be issued by the division of building safety or a city or county that has by ordinance adopted a building code and whose installation inspection programs have been approved by the division. All installations shall be inspected by the authority having jurisdiction for compliance.

Permit fees shall be prescribed in administrative rules promulgated by the administrator of the division of building safety or as established by the city or county having jurisdiction and whose installation inspection program has been approved by the division, as applicable.

Immediately upon completion of the installation of a mobile or manufactured home, a licensed installer shall perform an inspection of the completed installation to ensure compliance with the applicable installation standard. Such inspection shall be recorded on an inspection record document approved by the division and a copy shall be provided to the homeowner upon completion of the inspection.

§ 44-2203 — 44-2205. Manufacturer’s instructions on stabilizing system may be used — Requirements for installing stabilizing systems — Requirements for permanent foundations. [Repealed.]

§ 44-2206. Installation of electrical service equipment. [Repealed.]